District of Columbia statutes.
44-1504

Bylaws.

The said Society, for fixing the terms of admission of its members, for the government of the same, for the election, changing, and altering the officers above named, and for the general regulation and management of its affairs, shall have power to form a code of bylaws, not inconsistent with the laws of the District of Columbia, or of the United States, which code, when formed and adopted at a regular meeting, shall, until modified or rescinded, be equally binding as this chapter upon the Society, its officers, and members.

June 21, 1870, 16 Stat. 158, ch. 135, § 4
1981 Ed., § 32-904.
1973 Ed., § 32-204.